Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2586.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Music Therapy Practice Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Music therapist." An individual who is certified through and holds a valid credential from the Certification Board for Music Therapists, or a successor organization, to practice music therapy."Music therapy." The clinical and evidence-based use of music interventions through a therapeutic relationship designed 123456789101112131415161718 to achieve personalized goals for individuals of all ages and ability levels, to aid in developmental, rehabilitative, habilitative, medical, mental health, preventive or educational areas.Section 3. Prohibitions.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), an individual who is not a music therapist may not:(1) Hold oneself out as a music therapist or as being certified by the Certification Board for Music Therapists, or a successor organization, to practice music therapy.(2) Use the initials "MT-BC" or any other words, letters, abbreviations or insignia indicating or implying that the individual is a music therapist.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) does not prohibit an individual from using music in the performance of the individual's profession or occupation if the individual does not engage in the prohibited conduct enumerated in subsection (a).Section 4. Penalty.An individual who recklessly, knowingly or intentionally violates section 3 is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 5. Unfair trade practice.A violation of this act shall be deemed to be an unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2586PN3477 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728